District of Columbia statutes.
16-4428

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 29 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).